Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF978.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.61, subdivision 12, is amended to read: Subd. 12. Farm machinery. (a) "Farm machinery" means new or used machinery, equipment, implements, accessories, and contrivances used directly and principally in agricultural production of tangible personal property intended to be sold ultimately at retail including, but not limited to: (1) machinery for the preparation, seeding, or cultivation of soil for growing agricultural crops; (2) barn cleaners, milking systems, grain dryers, feeding systems including stationary feed bunks, and similar installations, whether or not the equipment is installed by the seller and becomes part of the real property; and (3) irrigation equipment sold for exclusively agricultural use, including pumps, pipe fittings, valves, sprinklers, and other equipment necessary to the operation of an irrigation system when sold as part of an irrigation system, whether or not the equipment is installed by the seller and becomes part of the real property. (b) Farm machinery does not include: (1) repair or replacement parts; (2) tools, shop equipment, deleted text begin grain bins,deleted text end fencing material, communication equipment, and other farm supplies; (3) motor vehicles taxed under chapter 297B; (4) snowmobiles or snow blowers; (5) lawn mowers except those used in the production of sod for sale, or garden-type tractors or garden tillers; or (6) machinery, equipment, implements, accessories, and contrivances used directly in the production of horses not raised for slaughter, fur-bearing animals, or research animals. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.69, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Machinery, equipment, and fencing. new text begin (a) new text end The following machinery, equipment, and fencing is exempt: (1) farm machinery; (2) logging equipment, including chain saws used for commercial logging; (3) fencing used for the containment of farmed Cervidae, as defined in section 35.153, subdivision 3; (4) primary and backup generator units used to generate electricity for the purpose of operating farm machinery, aquacultural production equipment, or logging equipment, or providing light or space heating necessary for the production of livestock, dairy animals, dairy products, or poultry and poultry products; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (5) aquaculture production equipmentdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (6) grain bins; and new text end new text begin (7) tractor tires. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this subdivision, "grain bin" means a fixed structure used to store grains that maintains temperature or humidity levels, or both, to prevent spoilage and protect from infestation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end